Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-315
Collector, defined.

Collector means the owner of one or more historical vehicles who collects, purchases, acquires, trades, or disposes of such historical vehicles or parts thereof for his or her own use in order to preserve, restore, and maintain a historical vehicle or vehicles for hobby purposes.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 15.